Nevada, session 83, AB566.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Museums and History of the
Department of Tourism and Cultural Affairs the sum of $34,487 for
the Nevada State Railroad Museums budget account for the costs of
a utility vehicle, a truck and tools for locomotive maintenance and
restoration at the Nevada State Railroad Museum in Boulder City.
2. Expenditure of $147,023 not appropriated from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 by the
Division of Museums and History of the Department of Tourism
and Cultural Affairs for the same purpose as set forth in
subsection 1.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Museums and History of the
Department of Tourism and Cultural Affairs the sum of $41,294 for
the Nevada State Railroad Museums budget account for the costs of
a utility vehicle and tractor and for the repair of an electronic sign at
the Nevada State Railroad Museum in Carson City.
2. Expenditure of $176,044 not appropriated from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 by the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Division of Museums and History of the Department of Tourism
and Cultural Affairs for the same purpose as set forth in
subsection 1.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)